Mississippi, session 2026, SB2131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 13-5-62, Mississippi Code of 1972: 13-5-62.  When a grand jury returns an indictment, the court, upon request of the defendant, shall make available for inspection a record of the grand jury proceeding to the defendant or his or her counsel.  In its discretion, the court, upon application, may permit copies of the record to be produced at the defendant's expense.  Any copies of the record shall be kept confidential.  For the purposes of this section, "record" means a transcript or electronic recording. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.